fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour machines cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour simulateurs d’escaliers et steppers: Porte-bidons pour simulateurs d’escalier et steppers; Housses pour simulateurs d’escalier et steppers; Supports d’ordinateur pour simulateurs d’escalier et steppers; Pièces de rechange pour simulateurs d’escaliers et steppers; Supports de tablette pour simulateurs d’escaliers et steppers
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bài tập dành cho tim > Phụ kiện và bộ phận máy tập tim mạch > Phụ kiện & bộ phận máy tập leo cầu thang: Khay để bình nước máy tập leo cầu thang; Vỏ bọc máy tập leo cầu thang; Giá đỡ laptop máy tập leo cầu thang; Phụ tùng thay thế máy tập leo cầu thang; Giá đỡ máy tính bảng cho máy tập leo cầu thang
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 有酸素運動 > カーディオマシン関連用品・部品 > ステアクライマー・ステッパー関連用品・部品: ステアクライマー・ステッパー用ボトルホルダー; ステアクライマー・ステッパー用カバー; ステアクライマー・ステッパー用ノートPCスタンド; ステアクライマー・ステッパー交換部品; ステアクライマー・ステッパータブレットホルダー
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kardio > Dodatki in deli za kardio naprave > Dodatki in deli za fitnes stopnice in steperje: Držala za steklenice za fitnes stopnice in steperje; Pokrivala za fitnes stopnice in steperje; Stojala za prenosne računalnike za fitnes stopnice in steperje; Nadomestni deli za fitnes stopnice in steperje; Držala za tablične računalnike za fitnes stopnice in steperje
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 有氧运动 > 有氧运动器械配件/零件 > 爬楼梯机/踏步机配件/零件: 登山机与踏步机水壶架; 登山机与踏步机防尘罩; 登山机与踏步机笔记本电脑支架; 爬楼梯机/踏步机替换零件; 爬楼梯机/踏步机平板电脑支架
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Kardio cvičenie > Príslušenstvo a diely kardio prístrojov > Príslušenstvo a diely pre nekonečné schody a stepery: Držiaky na fľaše pre nekonečné schody a stepery; Obaly pre nekonečné schody a stepery; Stojany pre nekonečné schody a stepery; Náhradné diely pre nekonečné schody a stepery; Držiaky tabletu pre nekonečné schody a stepery
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 心肺運動 > 心肺訓練器材配件/零件 > 登山機配件/零件: 樓梯機與踏步機水壺架; 樓梯機與踏步機保護套; 樓梯機與踏步機筆記型電腦架; 登山機替換零件; 登山機和踏步機平板電腦支架
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > คาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่เครื่องคาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่เครื่องปีนบันไดและสเตปเปอร์: ที่วางขวดน้ำเครื่องจำลองการขึ้นบันไดและสเต็ปเปอร์; ผ้าคลุมเครื่องจำลองการขึ้นบันไดและสเต็ปเปอร์; ที่วางแล็ปท็อปเครื่องจำลองการขึ้นบันไดและสเต็ปเปอร์; ชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่เครื่องปีนบันไดและสเตปเปอร์; ที่วางแท็บเล็ตบนเครื่องปีนบันไดและสเตปเปอร์
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Cardio > Tilbehør og dele til cardiomaskiner > Tilbehør og dele til trappe- og stepmaskiner: Flaskeholdere til trappemaskiner og steppere; Overtræk til trappemaskiner og steppere; Holdere til bærbare computere til trappemaskiner og steppere; Reservedele til trappe- og stepmaskiner; Tabletholdere til trappe- og stepmaskiner
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kardió > Kardiógép-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek > Lépcsőzőgép- és taposógép-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek: Lépcsőzőgép és stepper kulacstartók; Lépcsőzőgép és stepper takaróponyvák; Lépcsőzőgép és stepper laptoptartók; Lépcsőzőgép- és taposógép-cserealkatrészek; Lépcsőzőgép- és taposógép-táblatartók
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Cardio > Accesorios y piezas para máquinas cardiovasculares > Accesorios y piezas para stepper y máquina de subir escalones: Portabotellas para escaladoras; Fundas para escaladoras; Soportes de laptop para escaladoras; Piezas de repuesto para stepper y máquina de subir escalones; Soportes para tabletas para stepper y máquina de subir escalones
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Konditionsträning > Tillbehör och delar till konditionsträningsmaskiner > Tillbehör och delar till trappmaskiner: Flaskhållare för trappmaskiner och steppers; Överdrag för trappmaskiner och steppers; Datorställ för trappmaskiner och steppers; Reservdelar till trappmaskiner; Surfplattehållare till trappmaskiner
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Kardiyo > Kardiyo Makinesi Aksesuarları ve Parçaları > Merdiven Tırmanıcı ve Step Aksesuarları ve Parçaları: Merdiven makinesi ve stepper matara tutucuları; Merdiven makinesi ve stepper kılıfları; Merdiven makinesi ve stepper dizüstü bilgisayar stantları; Merdiven Tırmanıcı ve Step Yedek Parçaları; Merdiven Tırmanıcı ve Step Tablet Tutucular
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Kardio > Tilbehør og deler til kardiomaskiner > Tilbehør og deler til trappe- og stepmaskiner: Flaskeholdere for trappemaskiner og steppere; Trekk for trappemaskiner og steppere; PC-stativer for trappemaskiner og steppere; Reservedeler til trappe- og stepmaskiner; Nettbrettholdere til trappe- og stepmaskiner
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Cardio > Accessori e ricambi per macchine cardio > Accessori e ricambi per montascale e stepper: Portaborracce per stepper e saliscale; Coperture per stepper e saliscale; Supporti per laptop per stepper e saliscale; Parti di ricambio per montascale e stepper; Supporti per tablet per scale e stepper
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kardiotreniruotės > Kardiotreniruoklių priedai ir dalys > Laiptų ir žingsniavimo treniruoklių priedai ir dalys: Laiptinių treniruoklių ir steperių gertuvių laikikliai; Laiptinių treniruoklių ir steperių uždangalai; Laiptinių treniruoklių ir steperių nešiojamųjų kompiuterių stovai; Laiptų ir žingsniavimo treniruoklių atsarginės dalys; Laiptų ir žingsniavimo treniruoklių planšetinių kompiuterių laikikliai
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 카디오 > 카디오 머신 부대용품/부품 > 스테어 클라이머/스테퍼 부대용품/부품: 스텝밀 및 스텝퍼 물병 홀더; 스텝밀 및 스텝퍼 커버; 스텝밀 및 스텝퍼 노트북 스탠드; 스테어 클라이머/스테퍼 교체용 부품; 스테어 클라이머/스테퍼 태블릿 거치대
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kardio > Pribor i dijelovi za kardio sprave > Dodaci i dijelovi za stepere i simulatore za penjanje: Držači boca za stepere i simulatore za penjanje; Navlake za stepere i simulatore za penjanje; Stalci za laptop za stepere i simulatore za penjanje; Zamjenski dijelovi za stepere i simulatore za penjanje; Držači tableta za stepere i simulatore za penjanje
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Cardio > Zubehör und Teile für Cardiogeräte > Zubehör und Teile für Treppensteiger und Stepper: Flaschenhalter für Stairclimber & Stepper; Abdeckungen für Stairclimber & Stepper; Laptopständer für Stairclimber & Stepper; Ersatzeile für Treppensteiger und Stepper; Tablet-Halter für Treppensteiger und Stepper
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ & ανταλλακτικά για μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ & εξαρτήματα για αναρριχητήρα με σκάλες & βηματιστήρα (Stair Climber & Stepper): Βάσεις παγουριών μηχανημάτων stair climber και stepper; Καλύμματα μηχανημάτων stair climber και stepper; Βάσεις laptop μηχανημάτων stair climber και stepper; Ανταλλακτικά για αναρριχητήρα με σκάλες & βηματιστήρα; Βάσεις tablet για αναρριχητήρα με σκάλες & βηματιστήρα
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Кардио тренировки > Аксесоари и части за машини за кардио > Аксесоари и части за уреди за изкачване на стълби и степери: Стойки за бутилки за уреди за изкачване на стълби и степери; Покривала за уреди за изкачване на стълби и степери; Стойки за лаптоп за уреди за изкачване на стълби и степери; Резервни части за уреди за изкачване на стълби и степери; Стойки за таблети за уреди за изкачване на стълби и степери
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Cardio > Accesorii și piese pentru aparate de fitness > Accesorii și piese pentru scări rulante și steppere pentru fitness: Suporturi pentru sticlă la aparate de urcat scări și steppere; Huse pentru aparate de urcat scări și steppere; Suporturi pentru laptop la aparate de urcat scări și steppere; Piese de schimb pentru scări rulante și steppere pentru fitness; Suporturi pentru tablete pentru scări rulante și steppere pentru fitness
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kardio > Trenažery – příslušenství a díly > Steppery – příslušenství a díly: Držáky na láhev ke stepperům a schodům; Obaly na steppery a schody; Držáky na notebook ke stepperům a schodům; Steppery – náhradní díly; Steppery – držáky na tablet
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening kardio > Akcesoria i części do urządzeń cardio > Akcesoria i części do schodołazów i stepperów: Uchwyty na bidon do stepperów i schodów treningowych; Pokrowce na steppery i schody treningowe; Podstawki pod laptop do stepperów i schodów treningowych; Części zamienne do schodołazów i stepperów; Uchwyty na tablet do schodołazów i stepperów
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Кардиотренировки > Аксессуары и детали для кардиотренажеров > Аксессуары и детали для тренажеров-лестниц и степперов: Держатели для бутылок для степперов и климберов; Чехлы для степперов и климберов; Подставки для ноутбуков для степперов и климберов; Запасные детали для тренажеров-лестниц и степперов; Держатели планшетов для тренажеров-лестниц и степперов
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kestävyysurheilu > Kestävyysurheilulaitteiden lisätarvikkeet ja -osat > Porraslaitteiden ja stepperien lisätarvikkeet ja -osat: Porras- ja askelluskoneiden pullotelineet; Porras- ja askelluskoneiden suojukset; Porras- ja askelluskoneiden kannettavien tietokoneiden telineet; Porraslaitteiden ja stepperien varaosat; Porraslaitteiden ja stepperien tablettitelineet
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Cardio > Cardio Machine Accessories & Parts > Stair Climber & Stepper Accessories & Parts: Stair Climber & Stepper Bottle Holders; Stair Climber & Stepper Covers; Stair Climber & Stepper Laptop Stands; Stair Climber & Stepper Replacement Parts; Stair Climber & Stepper Tablet Holders
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para máquina de cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para máquina de escadas e stepper: Suportes de garrafas para máquinas de step; Capas para máquinas de step; Suportes de portáteis para máquinas de step; Peças de substituição para máquina de escadas e stepper; Suportes de tablet para máquina de escadas e stepper
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Cardio > Accessoires en onderdelen voor cardioapparaten > Accessoires en onderdelen voor trapklimmers en -steppers: Stairclimber- en stepperbidonhouders; Stairclimber- en stepperhoezen; Stairclimber- en stepperlaptopstandaards; Vervangingsonderdelen voor trapklimmers en -steppers; Tablethouders voor trapklimmers en -steppers
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardio > Acessórios e peças para máquinas de cardio > Acessórios e peças para simuladores de escada: Porta-garrafas para simuladores de escada e steppers; Capas para simuladores de escada e steppers; Suportes de notebook para simuladores de escada e steppers; Peças de reposição para simuladores de escada; Suportes para tablets para simuladores de escada